en: milk proteins
bg: млечни протеини, млечен протеин, млечен белтък
bs: mliječne bjelančevina
ca: Proteina de la llet, proteines de la llet, proteïnes làcties
cs: mléčnou bílkovinu
da: mælkeprotein
de: Milcheiweiß, Milcheiweib, Milchprotein, Milcheiweißerzeugnis, Milcheiweisserzeugnis, Magermilchpulverzusatz, Milcheiweiss, Milchproteine
es: proteína de leche, proteinas lacteas
fi: maitoproteiini, maitoproteiinit
fr: protéine de lait, protéines de lait, protéines du lait, protéines laitières, protéines lactiques, protéine lactique, lactoprotéine, lactoprotéines
he: חלבוני חלב, חלבון חלב
hr: mliječne bjelančevine, mliječnih bjelančevina, mliječni proteini
hu: tejfehérjék, tejfehérje
it: proteine del latte
ja: 乳たんぱく質, 乳たん白
lv: piena olbaltumvielas
mk: млечни протеини
nb: melkeproteiner
nl: melkeiwit, melkeiwitten, melk eiwit
pl: Białka mleczne, białka mleka, białko mleka, proteiny mleczne, proteina z mleka
pt: proteína do leite, proteínas lácteas
ro: proteină din lapte, proteine din lapte, proteine de lapte
ru: молочный белок, молочные белки
sk: mliečnu bielkovinu, mliečne bielkoviny
sl: mlečne beljakovine
sr: mliječni proteini, mlečni proteini
sv: mjölkprotein, mjölkproteiner

en: milk protein isolate
de: Milcheiweißisolat
fr: isolat de protéines du lait
hr: izolat mliječnih proteina, ekstrudat
it: Proteine isolate del latte

en: organic milk proteins
fi: luomumaitoproteiini, luomu maitoproteiini
hr: organski mliječni proteini
hu: bio tejfehérjék, bio tejfehérje
it: proteine del latte biologiche
nl: biologisch melkeiwit

en: hydrolysed milk protein
bg: хидролизиран млечен протеин
da: hydrolyseret mælkeprotein
de: Milchproteinhydrolysat, hydrolysiertes Milcheiweiß, hydrolysiertes Milcheiweiss
es: proteína de leche hidrolizada
fi: hydrolysoitu maitoproteiini, maitoproteiinihydrolysaatti
fr: protéine de lait hydrolysée
hr: hidrolizirani mliječni protein
hu: hidrolizált tejfehérje
it: proteine de latte idrolizzate
nl: gehydroliseerd melkeiwit
pl: hydrolizat białka mlecznego
sv: hydrolyserat mjölkprotein

fr: protéines de lait en poudre
nl: melkeiwitpoeder

en: milk protein concentrate
de: Milcheiweißkonzentrat
es: Proteina de leche concentrada
fi: maitoproteiinitiiviste
fr: Protéine de lait concentré
hr: koncentrat mliječnih proteina
hu: tejfehérje koncentrátum
it: Proteine del latte concentrate
nl: melkeiwitconcentraat
pl: koncentrat białek mleka

en: whey protein, whey proteins, milk whey proteins
ar: بروتين مصل اللبن
bg: суроватъчен протеин, суроватъчни протеини
da: valleprotein
de: Molkenprotein, Molkeneiweiß, Molkeneiweiss
es: Proteína de suero de leche
fa: پروتیین وی
fi: heraproteiini
fr: protéine de lactosérum, protéines de petit-lait
hi: मट्ठा प्रोटीन
hr: proteina sirutke, proteini sirutke, proteinska sirutka, mliječni sirutkini proteini
hu: savófehérje, tejsavófehérje, savófehérjék, tejsavófehérjék
id: Protein susu
it: Proteine del siero del latte, WP
ja: 乳清タンパク質
nl: Weiproteïnepreparaat, Weiproteïne, wei-eiwit
pl: Białko z serwatki, białko serwatkowe, białka serwatkowe, białek serwatkowych
pt: Proteína do soro do leite
sv: Vassleprotein
th: โปรตีนหางนม
uk: Сироватковий білок
vi: Đạm váng sữa
zh: 乳清蛋白

en: concentrated whey protein
bg: протеинов концентрат от млечна суроватка
ca: concentrat de proteïna de sèrum de llet
cs: koncentrát syrovátkových bílkovin
da: koncentreret valleprotein, valleproteinkoncentrat
de: konzentriertes Molkeprotein, Molkeneiweißkonzentrat, Molkeneiweiß-Konzentrat
es: concentrado de proteína de suero
fi: heraproteiinikonsentraatti
fr: concentré de protéines de lactosérum, concentré de protéines de sérum
hr: koncentrat bjelančevina sirutke
hu: sűrített savófehérje, sűrített tejsavófehérje
it: concentrato di proteine del siero di latte, Proteine del siero di latte concentrate
nl: geconcentreerd wei-eiwit, wei-eiwitconcentraat
pl: koncentrat białek serwatkowych, koncentrat białka serwatkowego, koncentrat białek serwatki
pt: concentrado de proteína de soro de leite
ro: concentrat de proteine din zer
sk: koncentrát srvátkových bielkovín
sv: vassleproteinkoncentrat

en: whey protein isolate, whey isolate
de: Molkenprotein-Isolat , Whey Protein Isolat, Whey Isolat, Molkenproteinisolat
es: Proteína de suero aislada
fi: heraproteiini-isolaatti
fr: Isolat de protéine de lactosérum
hr: izolat proteina sirutke
hu: izolált savófehérje, izolált tejsavófehérje, savófehérje izolátum, tejsavófehérje izolátum
it: Isolato proteico di siero
nl: wei-eiwitisolaat
pl: izolat serwatki

en: Casein
ar: كازين
be: Казеін
bg: Казеин
bs: Kazein
ca: Caseïna
cs: Kasein
cy: Casein
da: kasein
de: Casein, Kasein
el: Καζεΐνη
eo: Kazeino
es: Caseína
et: Kaseiin
eu: Kaseina
fa: کازئین
fi: Kaseiini
fr: Caséine
ga: Cáiséin
gl: Caseína
he: קזאין
hi: केसीन
hr: kazein
hu: kazein
hy: Կազեին
id: Kasein
io: Kazeino
it: Caseina
ja: カゼイン
kk: Казеин
ko: 카세인
ky: Казеин
lv: Kazeīns
ms: Kasein
nb: Kasein
nl: Caseïne
nn: Kasein, ostestoff
pl: Kazeina
pt: Caseína
ro: Cazeină
ru: Казеин
sh: Kazein
sl: Kazein
sr: Казеин
sv: Kasein
th: เคซีน
tr: Kazein
uk: Казеїн
zh: 酪蛋白

en: caseinate
bg: казеинат
de: Caseinat
es: Caseinato
fi: kaseinaatti
fr: caséinate
hr: kazeinat
hu: kazeinát
it: caseinato
nl: Calciumcaseïnaat

en: sodium caseinate
bg: натриев казеинат
da: natriumcaseinat
de: Natriumcaseinat
el: καζεϊνικό του νατρίου
es: caseinato de sodio
fi: natriumkaseinaatti
fr: caséinate de sodium
hr: natrijev kazein, natrijev kazeinat
hu: nátrium-kazeinát
it: caseinato di sodio, cassinato di sodio
ja: カゼインナトリウム, カゼインNa, カゼインＮａ
nl: natriumcaseïnaat
pl: kazeinian sodu
pt: caseinato de sódio

en: calcium caseinate
bg: калциев казеинат
de: Calciumcaseinat
es: caseinato de calcio, sales de calcio de la leche
fr: Caséinate de calcium
hr: kalcijev kazeinat
it: Caseinato di calcio
nl: Calcium caseïnaat

en: rapeseed protein
bg: рапичен протеин
da: rapsprotein
de: Rapseiweiß
fi: rapsiproteiini
fr: protéine de colza, protéines de colza
hr: protein uljane repice
it: proteina di colza
pt: proteína de colza
sv: rapsprotein

en: hydrolysed rapeseed protein, hydrolyzed rapeseed protein
bg: хидролизиран рапичен протеин
da: hydrolyseret rapsprotein
hr: hidrolizirani protein uljane repice
it: proteina di colza idrolizzata
nl: gehydrolyseerd koolzaadeiwit
pl: hydrolizat białka rzepakowego, hydrolizat białek rzepakowych
pt: proteína de colza hidrolisada
sv: hydrolyserat rapsprotein

en: rapeseed and corn protein
da: raps- og majsprotein
pt: proteína de colza e milho
sv: raps- och majsprotein

en: protein crisp, protein crisps
sv: proteincrisp

en: proteins mix
de: Proteinmischung
es: mezcla de proteínas
fr: mélange de protéines
hr: proteinska mješavina
it: Mix di proteine
pl: mieszanka białkowa

en: cocoa, cacao
ar: كاكاو
az: Kakao
bg: Какао
bo: སྦྲིད་རིལ།
ca: cacau
cs: Kakao
da: kakao
de: Kakao
el: κακάο
eo: kakao
es: cacao, cocoa
fa: کاکائو
fi: kaakao
fo: Kakao
fr: cacao
ga: cócó
he: קקאו
hi: कोको
hr: kakao, kakaov, theobroma cacao L, kakaovca, kakaa
hu: kakaó
id: Kakao
it: cacao
ja: ココア, カカオ
ko: 코코아
lt: kakava
lv: kakao
mt: kawkaw
nb: Kakao
nl: cacao
nn: Kakao
no: kakao
pl: kakao, kakaa, kakaowy, kakaowa, kakaowe, kakaowego, kakaowej, kakaowych
pt: cacau
ro: cacao
ru: какао, какао тёртое
sh: Kakao
sk: Kakao
sl: Kakav
sr: какао
sv: kakao
tr: Kakao
yi: קאקאו
zh: 可可粉

en: raw cocoa
fr: cacao cru